Washington statutes.
RCW 5.28.010

Who may administer.

Every court, judge, clerk of a court, state-certified court reporter, or notary public, is authorized to take testimony in any action, suit or proceeding, and such other persons in particular cases as authorized by law. Every such court or officer is authorized to collect fees established under RCW 36.18.020 and 36.18.012 through 36.18.018 and to administer oaths and affirmations generally and to every such other person in such particular case as authorized.

[ 2010 c 98 s 1; 1995 c 292 s 1; 1987 c 202 s 124; 2 H. C. s 1693; 1869 p 378 s 1; RRS s 1264.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Oath of witness in superior court to be administered by judge: Rules of court: Cf. CR 43(d).

Powers of courts, judicial officers to administer oaths: RCW 2.28.010, 2.28.060.